Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.140 and 2021 c 236 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a)(i) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than 30 days before conditional release, change of address for a person on conditional release, or unconditional discharge, except in the event of escape, the department ((of social and health services)) shall send written notice of conditional release, unconditional discharge, or escape, to the following:(((i)))(A) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative;(((ii)))(B) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative; ((and(iii)))(C) The sheriff of the county where the person was last convicted of a sexually violent offense, if the department does not know where the person will reside;(D) The members of the community in which the person will reside. For purposes of this section "members of the community" means any individual with a primary residence located in the same local jurisdiction that the person will reside; and(E) The members of the legislature of any district where the person will reside.(ii) The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of all sexually violent predators and that information shall be placed in the Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law enforcement.(b) A return to total confinement or to a secure community transition facility pending revocation or modification proceedings is not considered a change of address for purposes of (a) of this subsection, and an additional community notification process is not required, unless conditional release is revoked under RCW 71.09.098 or the return lasts longer than 90 days.(2)(a) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific person found to be a sexually violent predator under this chapter:(((a)))(i) The victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. "Next of kin" as used in this section means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children;(((b)))(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in his or her commitment trial under RCW 71.09.060; and(((c)))(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency.(b) Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the committed person.(3) If a person committed as a sexually violent predator under this chapter escapes from a department ((of social and health services)) facility, the department shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the committed person resided immediately before his or her commitment as a sexually violent predator, or immediately before his or her incarceration for his or her most recent offense. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and the victims of the sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the person is recaptured, the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.(4) If the victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of 16, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.(5)(a) The department ((of social and health services)) shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.(b) The notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section must include the address where the person will reside. If the department does not know where the person will reside, the required notice must clearly state that there is no known address for where the person will reside.(6) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a chief of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to request in writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.096 and 2025 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and direct a conditional release.(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.(4)(a) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community, which must include, at minimum, the condition that the person will be subject to electronic monitoring that, to the extent feasible, provides real-time tracking, programmable inclusion and exclusion zones, and the ability to provide notifications if the person tampers with the monitoring device or enters an exclusion zone. In imposing conditions, the court must impose a restriction on the proximity of the person's residence to public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 in accordance with RCW 72.09.340. Courts shall require a minimum distance restriction of ((500 feet))two miles on the proximity of the person's residence to child care facilities and public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12. The court shall order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and, within 60 days of the order to investigate, recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall be individualized to address the person's specific risk factors and criminogenic needs and may include, but are not limited to, the following: Specification of residence or restrictions on residence including distance restrictions, specification of contact with a reasonable number of individuals upon the person's request who are verified by the department of corrections to be appropriate social contacts, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.(b) To the greatest extent possible, the person, person's counsel, prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, treatment provider, supervising community corrections officer, and appropriate clinical staff of the special commitment center shall meet and collaborate to craft individualized, narrowly tailored, and empirically based conditions to present to the court to help facilitate the person's successful transition to the community.(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative proposed by the department, the court shall consider whether the person's less restrictive alternative placement is in accordance with fair share principles. To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, the legislature finds it is appropriate for releases to a less restrictive alternative to occur in a manner that adheres to fair share principles. The legislature recognizes that there may be reasons why the department may not recommend that a person be released to his or her county of commitment, including availability of individualized resources, the person's support needs, or when the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed through use of global positioning system technology, the unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release based on the department's proposal to a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings regarding its decision and identify whether the release remains in line with fair share principles.(b)(i) When the department develops a less restrictive alternative placement under this section, it shall attempt to identify a placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 that is aligned with fair share principles. The department shall document its rationale for the recommended placement.(ii) If the department does not support or recommend conditional release to a less restrictive alternative due to a clinical determination, the department shall document its objection and certify that the department is developing the less restrictive alternative pursuant to a court order and not because of a clinical determination.(iii) When the department develops or proposes a less restrictive alternative placement under this chapter, it shall be considered a predisposition recommendation.(iv) In developing, modifying, and enforcing less restrictive alternatives, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.(c) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation, including whether the department remains in compliance with fair share principles regarding releases under this chapter.(d) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.(e) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.(6)(a) When ordered by the court, the department must provide less restrictive alternative treatment that includes, at a minimum:(i) The services identified in the person's discharge plan as outlined in RCW 71.09.080(4);(ii) The assignment of a community care coordinator;(iii) Regular contacts with providers of court-ordered treatment services;(iv) Community escorts, if needed;(v) A transition plan that addresses the person's access to continued services upon unconditional discharge;(vi) Financial support for necessary housing;(vii) Life skills training and disability accommodations, if needed; and(viii) Assistance in pursuing benefits, education, and employment.(b) At the time the department of corrections is ordered to investigate a proposed less restrictive alternative placement, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall assign a social worker to assist the person with discharge planning, pursuing benefits, and coordination of care prior to release.(i) The social worker shall assist the person with completing applications for benefits prior to the person's release from total confinement.(ii) To promote continuity of care and the individual's success in the community, the department social worker shall be responsible for initiating a clinical transition of care between the last treating clinician at the special commitment center and the person's designated community treatment provider. This transition between one clinical setting to another shall occur no later than 15 days before an individual's release from the special commitment center.(iii) If applicable, the social worker shall assist the person with locating any needed disability accommodations in the community and with obtaining resources to help address the person's identified life skills needs prior to release from total confinement.(7) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.(8) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting agency so determines. The questions to be determined by the court are whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, and if so, whether a modification to the person's less restrictive alternative order is appropriate to ensure the conditional release remains in the best interest of the person and adequate to protect the victim and the community. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.097 and 2021 c 236 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In accordance with RCW 71.09.090 and 71.09.096, the department shall have the primary responsibility for developing a less restrictive alternative placement. To ensure the department has sufficient less restrictive alternative placements to choose from that satisfy the requirements of RCW 71.09.092, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department ((shall))must use a request for proposal process to solicit and contract with housing and treatment providers from across the state and facilitate fair share principles among the counties. In order to increase the number of housing options for individuals qualifying for a less restrictive alternative, the department shall have oversight of the vendors and providers who contract with the state, including the authority to inspect and ensure compliance, negotiate the rates charged for services, ensure adequate living conditions of housing locations, and terminate contracts. The department shall maintain a statewide accounting of the contracted community housing and treatment providers in each county and provide a biannual report to the legislature and governor by December 1st on the availability and adequacy of less restrictive alternative placements and the department's compliance with fair share principles.(b) When the department uses a request for proposal process under this subsection to increase the availability of housing options for individuals qualifying for a less restrictive alternative, the department may only enter into a contract with a housing provider after public notification and opportunities for public comment.(i) The department shall establish a process for early and continuous public participation including, at a minimum, public meetings in the local communities affected, as well as opportunities for written and oral comment. The department or the housing provider shall provide at least 14 days' advance notice of the meeting to all newspapers of general circulation in the community and all radio and television stations generally available in the community.(ii) The department shall contact the local government planning agencies in the communities affected and coordinate with local government agencies to ensure opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and to reduce duplication of notice and meetings.(2) To facilitate its duties required under this section, the department shall use the following housing matrix and considerations as a guide to planning and developing less restrictive alternative placements. The following considerations may not be used as a reason to deny a less restrictive alternative placement.(a) Considerations for evaluating a proposed vendor's application for less restrictive alternative housing services shall include applicable state and local zoning and building codes, general housing requirements, availability of public services, and other considerations identified in accordance with RCW 71.09.315. The department shall require the housing provider to provide proof that the facility is in compliance with all local zoning and building codes.(i) General housing requirements include running water, electricity, bedroom and living space of adequate size, and no mold or infestations.(ii) Availability of public services include availability of chaperones and whether the placement is within a reasonable distance to a grocery store, bank, public transportation options, and offices for public services and benefits.(iii) Other considerations include whether the placement is consistent with fair share principles across the counties, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to other current or planned components of the less restrictive alternative, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to employment opportunities, and the reliability of global positioning system technology.(b) Factors for evaluating less restrictive alternative options for a specific individual include sex offender treatment considerations, criminogenic needs and risk factors, protective factors, and the specific needs of the client.(i) Sex offender treatment considerations include whether the housing is within a reasonable distance from the treatment provider, whether the treatment provider is a good therapeutic match with the client, and whether the treatment provider has relevant experience and background to treat the client if the client has special needs.(ii) Criminogenic needs and risk factors include consideration of the person's specific needs and risk factors in evaluating less restrictive alternative options.(iii) Protective factors include whether housing is within a reasonable distance of family, friends, potential hobbies, potential employment, and educational opportunities.(iv) Consideration of the client's specific needs includes assessing the availability of personal care assistance and in-home care assistance, and whether housing is within a reasonable distance of mental health, medical treatment options, and substance use disorder treatment options.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall require that all individuals who were participating in the community protection program agree to remain at least two miles from child care facilities and public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 before providing other home and community-based waiver services to that individual.(2) If an individual does not agree to the restriction provided under subsection (1) of this section, the department may not provide home and community-based waiver services to that individual.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) Conditional release to a less restrictive alternative and siting of future secure community transition facilities is temporarily prohibited.(2) The courts and department of social and health services are temporarily prohibited from authorizing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative placement pursuant to RCW 71.09.090, 71.09.092, 71.09.094, 71.09.096, 71.09.097, 71.09.280, and 71.09.345, subject to the following exceptions:(a) The courts and department of social and health services may continue to place civilly committed sex offenders in the secure community transition facility in south Seattle in King county; and(b) The courts and department of social and health services may continue to place civilly committed sex offenders in the secure community transition facility located on McNeil Island in Pierce county.(3)(a) The department of social and health services and secretary of social and health services are temporarily prohibited from siting, constructing, or entering into any contracts with effective dates on or after the effective date of this section regarding secure community transition facilities pursuant to RCW 71.09.099, 71.09.250, 71.09.252, 71.09.255, 71.09.343, and 71.09.344, except for unused facilities on McNeil Island.(b) The department and secretary may develop additional facilities on McNeil Island during the temporary prohibition.(4) This section expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1)(a) A legislative work group on siting secure community transition facilities is established, with the following members:(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate. At least one member must be a member of the senate law and justice committee, and at least one member must be a member of the senate human services committee;(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives. The house community safety, justice, and reentry committee, civil rights and judiciary committee, and local government committee must each be represented;(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint six members representing two survivors of violent sex crimes, the office of crime victims advocacy, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, a licensed sex offender treatment provider, and the Washington state association of counties;(iv) The secretary of the department of social and health services shall appoint one member representing the department of social and health services;(v) The secretary of the department of corrections shall appoint one member representing the department of corrections; and(vi) The sex offender policy board shall appoint one member representing the sex offender policy board.(b) The ranking member of the work group from the house community safety, justice, and reentry committee shall convene the initial meeting of the work group.(i) The work group shall choose its chair and cochair from among its legislative membership.(ii) The work group may select other officers from among its members as the work group deems appropriate.(2) The work group shall:(a) Evaluate the siting criteria for secure community transition facilities, including opportunities for local control of siting by counties and cities;(b) Evaluate the requirements of chapter 71.09 RCW and recommend amendments to implement the work group's recommendations;(c) Identify recommendations to ensure the equitable distribution of secure community transition facilities statewide;(d) Identify recommendations for public notification, awareness, and opportunities for review and comment in communities affected by the siting of secure community transition facilities;(e) Identify recommendations for the security and safety of residents of communities affected by the siting of secure community transition facilities; and(f) Identify recommendations for less restrictive alternative security measures, staff ratios, and staff and chaperone training.(3) The work group shall hold at least six meetings. The first meeting of the work group must occur by August 31, 2026.(4) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.(5) State agencies, departments, and commissions shall cooperate with the work group and provide information as the chair or cochair may reasonably request.(6) Legislative members of the work group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(7) The expenses of the work group shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Work group expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.(8) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations by June 30, 2027, to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature.(a) Recommendations of the work group may be made by a simple majority of work group members.(b) In the event that the work group does not reach majority-supported recommendations, the work group may report minority recommendations supported by at least two members of the work group.(c) Notice of the completion of the findings and recommendations required in this subsection must be published in the Washington State Register by June 30, 2027.(9) This section expires December 31, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---